Tennessee, session 114, HB1531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-406, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) If a current or former member of the general assembly dies, the governor
shall proclaim a statewide day of mourning and order the state flag to be flown at half-
staff over the state capitol during such period of mourning. The governor is not required
to take action under this section if the member or former member had been convicted of
a felony.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1531
008872
- 1 -